District of Columbia statutes.
29A-711

Repealed

Dissolution; reversion of property to donors.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1283, ch. 854, § 597
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(6), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-711.
1981 Ed., § 29-911.
1973 Ed., § 29-511.